test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-saraz_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 



  Noun - сараз: # Ordinary nouns 'city' - full paradigm including MWN
     сараз+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: сараз
     сараз+N+SP+Gen+Indef: саразонь
     сараз+N+SP+Abl+Indef: саразда
     сараз+N+SP+Dat+Indef: саразонди
     сараз+N+SP+Abe+Indef: саразфтома
     сараз+N+SP+Cmpr+Indef: саразшка
     сараз+N+SP+Ine+Indef: саразса
     сараз+N+SP+Ela+Indef: саразста
     сараз+N+SP+Ill+Indef: саразс
     сараз+N+SP+Lat+Indef: саразу
     сараз+N+SP+Prl+Indef: саразга
     сараз+N+SP+Tra+Indef: саразкс
     сараз+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: саразозе
     сараз+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: саразне
     сараз+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: саразозень
     сараз+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: саразнень
     сараз+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [саразозти, саразозенди]
     сараз+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: саразненди
     сараз+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1: сараздон
     сараз+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1: саразфтомон
     сараз+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg1: саразшкан
     сараз+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1: саразсон
     сараз+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1: саразстон
     сараз+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1: саразозон
     сараз+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1: саразган
     сараз+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: саразце
     сараз+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: сарасне
     сараз+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: саразцень
     сараз+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: сараснень
     сараз+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2: сараздот
     сараз+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2: саразфтомот
     сараз+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg2: саразшкат
     сараз+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2: саразсот
     сараз+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2: саразстот
     сараз+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2: саразозот
     сараз+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2: саразгат
     сараз+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: саразоц
     сараз+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: саразонза
     сараз+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: саразонц
     сараз+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: саразонзон
     сараз+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: саразонцты
     сараз+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: саразонзонды
     сараз+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3: сараздонза
     сараз+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3: саразфтомонза
     сараз+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg3: саразшканза
     сараз+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3: саразсонза
     сараз+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3: саразстонза
     сараз+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3: саразозонза
     сараз+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3: саразганза
     сараз+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1: саразоньке
     сараз+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1: саразоньконь
     сараз+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1: саразоньконди
     сараз+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1: сараздонк
     сараз+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1: саразфтомонк
     сараз+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl1: саразшканк
     сараз+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1: саразсонк
     сараз+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1: саразстонк
     сараз+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1: саразозонк
     сараз+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1: саразганк
     сараз+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2: саразонте
     сараз+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2: саразонтень
     сараз+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2: саразонтенди
     сараз+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2: сараздонт
     сараз+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2: саразфтомонт
     сараз+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl2: саразшкант
     сараз+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2: саразсонт
     сараз+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2: саразстонт
     сараз+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2: саразозонт
     сараз+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2: саразгант
     сараз+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3: саразсна
     сараз+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3: саразснон
     сараз+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3: саразснонды
     сараз+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3: сараздост
     сараз+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3: саразфтомост
     сараз+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl3: саразшкаст
     сараз+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3: саразсост
     сараз+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3: саразстост
     сараз+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3: саразозост
     сараз+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3: саразгаст
     сараз+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: сараст
     сараз+N+Sg+Nom+Def: саразсь
     сараз+N+Sg+Gen+Def: саразть
     сараз+N+Sg+Dat+Def: саразти
     сараз+N+Pl+Nom+Def: сарасне
     сараз+N+Pl+Gen+Def: сараснень
     сараз+N+Pl+Dat+Def: сарасненди    
     сараз+N+Sg+Nom+Indef+Clt/Add: саразовок
     сараз+N+SP+Gen+Indef+Clt/Add: саразоньге 
     сараз+N+SP+Abl+Indef+Clt/Add: сараздовок
     сараз+N+SP+Dat+Indef+Clt/Add: [саразондивок, саразондиге, саразондинге]
     сараз+N+SP+Abe+Indef+Clt/Add: саразфтомовок
     сараз+N+SP+Cmpr+Indef+Clt/Add: саразшкавок
     сараз+N+SP+Ine+Indef+Clt/Add: саразсовок
     сараз+N+SP+Ela+Indef+Clt/Add: саразстовок
     сараз+N+SP+Ill+Indef+Clt/Add: саразозовок
     сараз+N+SP+Prl+Indef+Clt/Add: саразгавок
     сараз+N+SP+Tra+Indef+Clt/Add: саразкска
     сараз+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Clt/Add: саразозевок
     сараз+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Clt/Add: саразневок
     сараз+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1+Clt/Add: саразозеньге
     сараз+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1+Clt/Add: саразненьге
     сараз+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1+Clt/Add: [саразозтивок, саразозтиге, саразозтинге]
     сараз+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1+Clt/Add: [саразнендивок, саразнендиге, саразнендинге]
     сараз+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1+Clt/Add: сараздонга
     сараз+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1+Clt/Add: саразфтомонга
     сараз+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg1+Clt/Add: саразшканга
     сараз+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1+Clt/Add: саразсонга
     сараз+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1+Clt/Add: саразстонга
     сараз+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1+Clt/Add: саразозонга
     сараз+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1+Clt/Add: саразганга
     сараз+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Clt/Add: саразцевок
     сараз+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Clt/Add: сарасневок
     сараз+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2+Clt/Add: саразценьге
     сараз+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2+Clt/Add: сарасненьге
     сараз+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2+Clt/Add: сараздотка
     сараз+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2+Clt/Add: саразфтомотка
     сараз+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg2+Clt/Add: саразшкатка
     сараз+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2+Clt/Add: саразсотка
     сараз+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2+Clt/Add: саразстотка
     сараз+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2+Clt/Add: саразозотка
     сараз+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2+Clt/Add: саразгатка
     сараз+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Clt/Add: саразоцка
     сараз+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Clt/Add: саразонзовок
     сараз+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3+Clt/Add: саразонцка
     сараз+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3+Clt/Add: саразонзонга
     сараз+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3+Clt/Add: саразонцтывок
     сараз+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3+Clt/Add: саразонзондывок
     сараз+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3+Clt/Add: сараздонзовок
     сараз+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3+Clt/Add: саразфтомонзовок
     сараз+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg3+Clt/Add: саразшканзовок
     сараз+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3+Clt/Add: саразсонзовок
     сараз+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3+Clt/Add: саразстонзовок
     сараз+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3+Clt/Add: саразозонзовок
     сараз+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3+Clt/Add: саразганзовок
     сараз+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1+Clt/Add: саразонькевок
     сараз+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1+Clt/Add: саразоньконьге
     сараз+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1+Clt/Add: [саразонькондивок, саразонькондиге, саразонькондинге]
     сараз+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1+Clt/Add: сараздонковок
     сараз+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1+Clt/Add: саразфтомонковок
     сараз+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl1+Clt/Add: саразшканковок
     сараз+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1+Clt/Add: саразсонковок
     сараз+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1+Clt/Add: саразстонковок
     сараз+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1+Clt/Add: саразозонковок
     сараз+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1+Clt/Add: саразганковок
     сараз+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2+Clt/Add: саразонтевок
     сараз+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2+Clt/Add: саразонтеньге
     сараз+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2+Clt/Add: [саразонтендивок, саразонтендиге, саразонтендинге]
     сараз+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2+Clt/Add: сараздонтовок
     сараз+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2+Clt/Add: саразфтомонтовок
     сараз+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl2+Clt/Add: саразшкантовок
     сараз+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2+Clt/Add: саразсонтовок
     сараз+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2+Clt/Add: саразстонтовок
     сараз+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2+Clt/Add: саразозонтовок
     сараз+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2+Clt/Add: саразгантовок
     сараз+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3+Clt/Add: саразсновок
     сараз+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3+Clt/Add: саразснонга
     сараз+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3+Clt/Add: саразснондывок
     сараз+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3+Clt/Add: сараздостка
     сараз+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3+Clt/Add: саразфтомостка
     сараз+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl3+Clt/Add: саразшкастка
     сараз+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3+Clt/Add: саразсостка
     сараз+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3+Clt/Add: саразстостка
     сараз+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3+Clt/Add: саразозостка
     сараз+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3+Clt/Add: саразгастка
     сараз+N+Pl+Nom+Indef+Clt/Add: сарастка
     сараз+N+Sg+Nom+Def+Clt/Add: саразське
     сараз+N+Sg+Gen+Def+Clt/Add: саразтьке
     сараз+N+Sg+Dat+Def+Clt/Add: [саразтивок, саразтиге, саразтинге]
     сараз+N+Pl+Nom+Def+Clt/Add: сарасневок
     сараз+N+Pl+Gen+Def+Clt/Add: сарасненьге
     сараз+N+Pl+Dat+Def+Clt/Add: [сараснендивок, сараснендиге, сараснендинге]
